Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-208 Funds required of existing and
new insurers for transacting additional classes of insurance. (a) An
insurer otherwise qualified may be authorized to transact combinations of
classes of insurance while having on deposit in a federally insured financial
institution within the State, additional paid- up capital stock in the case of
a stock insurer, or additional unimpaired surplus in the case of a mutual or
reciprocal insurer, subject to subsection (c) as to domestic mutual or
reciprocal insurers, and subject to section 431:3-203(a)(2). An insurer
wanting to transact additional classes of insurance must:

(1) Maintain at all times, in a federally insured
financial institution within the State, capital if a stock insurer, or surplus,
if a mutual or reciprocal insurer, equal to the sum required of each individual
class of insurance it desires to transact, as listed in Schedule "A"
of section 431:3-205;

(2) Maintain a sum total not to exceed $2,500,000;
and

(3) Obtain first the approval by the commissioner for
any withdrawals from this deposit.

(b) An insurer while possessing in a federally
insured financial institution within the State, $2,500,000 of capital in the
case of a stock insurer, or of unimpaired surplus in the case of a reciprocal
or mutual insurer, may be authorized to transact all classes of insurance,
subject to sections 431:3-204 to 431:3-206.

(c) To qualify for authority to transact a
combination of classes of insurance, a domestic mutual or reciprocal insurer
shall deposit in a federally insured financial institution within the State,
surplus in an amount equal to the paid-up capital stock required of stock
insurers for authority to transact a like combination of classes of insurance.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 348, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next